Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3610.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.735, is amended to read: 609.735 CONCEALING IDENTITY. new text begin (a) new text end A person whose identity is concealed by the person in a public place by means of a robe, mask, or other disguise, unless based on religious beliefs, or incidental to amusement, entertainment, protection from weather, new text begin protection from smoke, gas, or other airborne toxin, new text end or medical treatment, is guilty of a misdemeanor. new text begin (b) This section does not apply to a peace officer, as defined in section 626.84, subdivision 1, paragraph (c), or a federal law enforcement officer, as defined in section 626.77, subdivision 3, while performing official duties as: new text end new text begin (1) an undercover officer and concealment of the officer's identity is necessary to preserve the integrity of the investigation or the officer's safety; or new text end new text begin (2) a member of a tactical response team when a face mask will substantially reduce a known risk of serious permanent disfigurement to the officer's face. new text end